District of Columbia statutes.
44-304.01

Regulations and standards; compliance.

(a)

Within 120 days of April 27, 1999, the Director shall promulgate any regulations and standards as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(b)

Health benefits plans and insurers subject to this chapter shall comply with the regulations promulgated pursuant to subsection (a) of this section for contracts issued or renewed on or after 120 days from the promulgation of final regulations pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

History

Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-274, § 401, 46 DCR 1294

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-574.1.